Tennessee, session 114, SB0794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The Southern Stars Symphonic Brass is hereby designated as the official brass
band of the state of Tennessee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002932